Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8206
Management of business; director or officer; restriction.

A board of directors or other governing body consisting of not less than three individuals shall manage the business of each captive insurer. The organizational documents or bylaws shall provide for the terms, meetings, and elections of the directors and officers of the governing body. No individual may serve as a director or officer who has been convicted of fraud involving any financial institution or of a felony involving misuse of funds.

Laws 2007, LB117, § 40.